Nevada, session 83, AB591.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. The sums set forth in sections 2 to 34, inclusive, of
this act are hereby appropriated from the State General Fund for the
purposes expressed in those sections and for the support of the
government of the State of Nevada for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
2025-2026 2026-2027
Sec. 2. The Office of the Governor.
For the support of the:
Office of the Governor ......... $6,086,691 $6,129,359
Office for New
Americans ....................... 538,177 548,960
Office of Finance .................. 6,946,980 7,338,591
Office of Finance –
Special
Appropriations ................ 275,000 250,000
Division of Internal
Audits .............................. 2,713,860 2,715,844
CORE.NV ............................ 4,417,619 4,410,215
Governor’s Mansion ............. 407,110 405,851
Agency for Nuclear
Projects ............................ 1,520,464 1,516,594
Office of Energy ................... 100 100
Office of Science,
Innovation and
Technology ..................... 4,469,267 4,486,360
Office of Federal
Assistance ....................... 931,814 929,726
Office of Emergency
Management .................... 1,801,768 1,847,207
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Homeland Security ............... $31,971 $35,063
Nevada Office of Cyber
Defense Coordination ..... 610,209 606,195
Sec. 3. The Office of Lieutenant Governor.
For the support of the Office
of the Lieutenant
Governor .............................. $1,138,358 $1,144,102
Sec. 4. The Office of Attorney General.
For the support of the:
Attorney General
Administration ................ $4,641,854 $4,004,696
Special Litigation
Account ........................... 1,208,655 1,208,655
Medicaid Fraud Control
Unit ................................. 283,887 693,868
Crime Prevention ................. 313,005 305,009
Office of the Extradition
Coordinator ..................... 1,676,123 1,679,909
Consumer’s Advocate .......... 900,314 882,351
Advisory Council for
Prosecuting Attorneys ..... 200,929 234,150
Grants Unit ........................... 109,645 117,390
Victims of Domestic
Violence .......................... 258,254 254,782
Investigations Unit ............... 3,263,601 3,260,362
Sec. 5. The Office of Secretary of State.
For the support of the:
Office of the Secretary of
State................................. $25,319,804 $26,361,219
Help America Vote Act ........ 1,369,246 1,399,240
Sec. 6. The Office of State Treasurer.
For the support of the:
Office of the State
Treasurer ......................... $728,058 $1,375,783
Nevada Employee
Savings Trust
Administration ................ 731,244 783,288
Sec. 7. The Office of State Controller.
For the support of the Office
of the State Controller .......... $7,868,693 $8,148,374
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Sec. 8. Department of Administration.
For the support of the:
National Judicial College
and National Council
of Juvenile and Family
Court Judges .................... $352,500 $352,500
Director’s Office .................. 46,694 46,417
State Public Works
Division - Marlette
Lake................................. 100 100
State Public Works
Division - Facility
Condition and
Analysis........................... 517,391 514,633
State Library ......................... 3,689,104 3,708,904
Archives and Public
Records ........................... 2,656,033 2,654,782
Merit Award Board .............. 8,000 0
Sec. 9. Department of Taxation.
For the support of the
Department of Taxation ....... $49,606,489 $50,752,402
Sec. 10. Legislative Fund.
For the support of the:
Legislative Commission ....... $550,000 $470,000
Audit Division ...................... 9,972,736 10,040,964
Administrative Division ....... 57,406,542 56,821,098
Legal Division ...................... 16,972,533 17,851,963
Research Division ................ 8,639,133 8,690,907
Fiscal Analysis Division....... 6,203,169 6,150,566
Interim Legislative
Operations ....................... 2,378,575 2,406,460
Sec. 11. Supreme Court of Nevada.
For the support of the:
Specialty Courts ................... $6,992,837 $7,348,654
Supreme Court of Nevada .... 2,880,532 2,903,731
Supreme Court Law
Library............................. 1,961,064 2,005,504
Senior Justice and Senior
Judge Program ................ 1,545,898 1,545,898
State Judicial Elected
Officials........................... 27,137,860 31,926,365
Court of Appeals .................. 439,925 457,895
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Judicial Department Staff
Salaries ............................ $30,081,655 $30,063,463
Administrative Office of
the Courts ........................ 5,226,178 5,028,707
Sec. 12. Commission on Judicial Discipline.
For the support of the
Commission on Judicial
Discipline ............................. $1,520,532 $1,503,129
Sec. 13. Office of Economic Development in the Office of the
Governor.
For the support of the:
Office of Economic
Development ................... $9,316,413 $9,363,531
Rural Community
Development ................... 265,616 262,429
Workforce Innovations
for a New Nevada
Account ........................... 2,005,000 2,005,000
Nevada Main Street
Program ........................... 341,669 341,669
Procurement Outreach
Program ........................... 332,631 332,640
Knowledge Account ............. 2,500,000 2,500,000
Sec. 14. Department of Tourism and Cultural Affairs.
For the support of the:
Museums and History
Administration ................ $160,359 $160,625
Nevada Historical
Society, Reno .................. 261,227 196,361
Nevada State Museum
Carson City ..................... 426,993 432,908
Nevada State Museum
Las Vegas ........................ 433,098 419,382
Lost City Museum ................ 125,702 123,291
Nevada State Railroad
Museums ......................... 338,299 364,433
Nevada Arts Council ............ 1,142,306 1,167,333
Nevada Humanities .............. 200,000 200,000
Sec. 15. Department of Education.
For the support of the:
Office of the
Superintendent ................ $3,517,887 $3,615,594
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Parental Involvement and
Family Engagement ........ $206,630 $222,173
Office of Early Learning
and Development ............ 55,472,586 73,161,810
Literacy Programs ................ 932,910 855,989
Student and School
Support ............................ 1,434,337 1,428,865
Standards and
Instructional Support ....... 4,417,646 4,414,297
District Support Services ...... 2,279,322 2,340,607
Career and Technical
Education ........................ 1,500,775 1,491,626
Continuing Education ........... 858,286 851,201
Individuals with
Disabilities Education
Act ................................... 777,408 833,362
Assessments and
Accountability ................. 15,690,289 15,752,361
Educator Effectiveness ......... 830,103 823,004
Data Systems
Management .................... 4,033,668 4,028,182
Safe and Respectful
Learning .......................... 1,985,600 2,021,214
Account for Alternative
Schools ............................ 178,013 188,908
Sec. 16. Nevada System of Higher Education.
For the support of the:
System Administration ......... $8,623,352 $8,606,893
System Computing
Center .............................. 20,666,545 20,600,234
University Press ................... 554,873 552,400
Special Projects .................... 2,512,557 2,507,585
Business Center North .......... 2,807,626 2,791,883
Business Center South .......... 2,326,864 2,311,557
University of Nevada,
Reno ................................ 179,729,463 178,640,909
UNR – Intercollegiate
Athletics .......................... 5,718,902 5,718,917
UNR – Statewide
Programs ......................... 10,386,322 10,353,179
Agricultural Experiment
Station ............................. 7,229,132 7,192,232
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Cooperative Extension
Service............................. $4,974,948 $4,945,036
UNR – School of
Medicine ......................... 44,062,675 43,929,486
Health Laboratory and
Research .......................... 2,210,917 2,200,687
University of Nevada,
Las Vegas ........................ 278,369,269 274,255,918
UNLV – School of
Medicine ......................... 55,979,322 55,540,125
UNLV – Intercollegiate
Athletics .......................... 8,664,978 8,651,793
UNLV – Statewide
Programs ......................... 6,189,655 6,176,170
UNLV Law School .............. 13,378,506 12,979,367
UNLV Dental School ........... 13,700,757 13,251,566
Great Basin College ............. 18,447,536 18,406,398
Nevada State University ....... 37,356,896 36,092,310
Desert Research Institute ...... 11,095,689 11,061,202
College of Southern
Nevada ............................ 127,608,809 124,740,751
Western Nevada College ...... 21,280,177 21,273,246
Truckee Meadows
Community College ........ 49,293,623 48,439,039
Silver State Opportunity
Grant Program ................. 5,000,000 5,000,000
Prison Education
Program ........................... 453,522 451,934
Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education:
Administration ................ 433,959 441,258
Loans and Stipends ......... 1,019,715 1,079,104
Sec. 17. Department of Human Services.
For the support of the:
Human Services
Administration ................ $3,663,872 $3,867,948
Grants Management Unit ..... 43,828 44,691
Aging and Disability Services Division:
Administration ................ 3,317,444 2,835,208
Autism Treatment
Assistance
Program...................... 8,399,600 9,078,215
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Home- and
Community-Based
Services ...................... $23,676,884 $23,993,362
Early Intervention
Services ...................... 44,254,663 44,671,495
Consumer Health
Assistance .................. 1,113,277 1,146,188
Nevada Commission
for Persons Who
Are Deaf and Hard
of Hearing .................. 34,282 34,282
Desert Regional
Center ......................... 157,326,317 159,090,450
Sierra Regional Center .... 53,291,830 54,300,507
Rural Regional Center ..... 21,515,700 21,752,842
Family Preservation
Program...................... 2,644,673 2,644,185
FOCIS and MFP ............. 637,144 652,836
Planning, Advocacy
and Community
Grants ......................... 8,827,116 8,924,274
Adult Protective
Services and Long-
Term Care .................. 16,410,878 16,745,273
State Independent
Living Council ........... 164,551 171,387
Division of Child and Family Services:
Community Juvenile
Justice Services .......... 3,322,626 3,339,674
Information Services ....... 5,175,496 5,222,385
Children, Youth and
Family
Administration ........... 8,709,768 8,779,793
Nevada Youth
Training Center .......... 10,669,819 10,802,139
Caliente Youth Center ..... 10,485,450 10,534,978
Rural Child Welfare ........ 13,960,457 14,284,511
Youth Alternative
Placement ................... 3,057,866 3,198,940
Youth Parole Services ..... 4,529,103 4,541,066
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Northern Nevada
Child and
Adolescent
Services ...................... $6,652,464 $6,867,439
Clark County Child
Welfare ...................... 73,146,380 73,520,211
Washoe County Child
Welfare ...................... 20,434,184 20,434,878
Southern Nevada
Child and
Adolescent
Services ...................... 25,307,188 25,721,922
Summit View Youth
Center ......................... 10,214,994 10,309,027
Family Support
Program...................... 2,417,037 2,952,757
Victims of Crime ............. 4,660,241 4,720,309
Division of Public and Behavioral Health:
Public Health:
Office of Health
Administration ........... 756,828 1,694,047
Maternal, Child and
Adolescent Health
Services ...................... 925,311 961,600
Community Health
Services ...................... 1,738,327 1,985,901
Emergency Medical
Services ...................... 1,268,110 1,259,222
Immunization
Program...................... 1,511,886 1,586,221
Health Investigations
and Epidemiology ...... 577,639 634,360
Chronic Disease .............. 568,829 568,829
Public Health
Preparedness
Program...................... 347,292 366,330
Family Planning .............. 2,676,849 2,694,747
Public Health
Improvements ............ 7,500,000 7,500,000
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Behavioral Health:
Southern Nevada
Adult Mental
Health Services .......... $130,636,893 $131,932,743
Northern Nevada
Adult Mental
Health Services .......... 28,103,572 28,621,632
Lake’s Crossing
Center ......................... 18,805,805 19,184,297
Rural Clinics ................... 16,812,806 17,000,795
Behavioral Health
Prevention and
Treatment ................... 6,481,894 6,917,849
Problem Gambling .......... 2,088,293 2,125,559
Division of Social Services:
Welfare
Administration ........... 22,012,553 21,819,673
Welfare Field Services .... 67,227,025 68,678,971
Assistance to Aged
and Blind .................... 12,445,616 13,042,413
Temporary Assistance
for Needy Families .... 24,607,810 24,607,810
Child Assistance and
Development .............. 2,580,421 2,580,421
Sec. 18. Nevada Health Authority.
For the support of the:
Nevada Medicaid ................. $1,175,394,320$1,273,173,048
Medicaid Administration...... 44,781,939 46,929,619
Public Option ....................... 2,608,025 2,625,248
Nevada Check-Up
Program ........................... 22,959,208 24,663,168
Developmental
Disabilities ...................... 163,866 161,595
Data Analytics ...................... 1,239,525 1,264,282
Patient Protection
Commission .................... 431,561 432,264
Health Care Facilities
Regulation ....................... 338,153 338,618
Account for the Graduate
Medical Education
Grant Program ................. 8,530,000 0
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Sec. 19. Office of the Military.
For the support of the:
Office of the Military ........... $8,639,942 $9,049,281
National Guard Benefits ....... 72,000 72,000
Sec. 20. Department of Veterans Services.
For the support of the:
Department of Veterans
Services ........................... $4,755,313 $4,617,100
Northern Nevada
Veterans Home
Account ........................... 438,360 438,360
Sec. 21. Department of Corrections.
For the support of the:
Office of the Director ........... $41,002,003 $43,387,588
Prison Medical Care ............. 70,115,282 72,037,324
Correctional Programs.......... 15,397,961 15,639,430
Southern Nevada
Correctional Center ......... 180,085 180,085
Southern Desert
Correctional Center ......... 45,142,948 47,278,436
Nevada State Prison ............. 156,984 156,984
Northern Nevada
Correctional Center ......... 41,752,291 42,525,981
Warm Springs
Correctional Center ......... 736,360 740,431
Ely State Prison .................... 31,382,032 32,266,262
Lovelock Correctional
Center .............................. 39,194,346 40,260,878
Florence McClure
Women’s Correctional
Center .............................. 27,818,121 28,254,226
Stewart Conservation
Camp ............................... 2,833,680 2,851,641
Ely Conservation Camp ....... 60,015 60,015
Humboldt Conservation
Camp ............................... 128,054 118,920
Three Lakes Valley
Conservation Camp ......... 4,058,803 4,134,668
Jean Conservation Camp ...... 2,638,482 2,679,085
Pioche Conservation
Camp ............................... 2,949,603 2,995,463
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Carlin Conservation
Camp ............................... $2,225,523 $2,269,437
Wells Conservation
Camp ............................... 36,349 21,793
Tonopah Conservation
Camp ............................... 96,339 75,379
Northern Nevada
Transitional Housing ....... 1,209,788 1,207,936
High Desert State Prison ...... 95,552,528 97,391,730
Casa Grande Transitional
Housing ........................... 5,325,891 5,375,639
Training Academy ................ 13,954,058 14,705,941
Prison Industry ..................... 250,000 0
Prison Ranch ........................ 350,000 0
Sec. 22. Department of Business and Industry.
For the support of the:
Business and Industry
Administration ................ $1,121,828 $1,092,454
Office of Business and
Planning .......................... 464,592 468,226
Real Estate
Administration ................ 3,040,911 2,802,205
Office of Labor
Commissioner ................. 3,647,750 4,007,295
New Markets
Performance
Guarantee Account .......... 144,955 147,376
Office of Nevada Boards,
Commissions and
Councils Standards .......... 324,029 0
Sec. 23. State Department of Agriculture.
For the support of the:
Administrative Services ....... $229,179 $288,920
Plant Health and
Quarantine Services ........ 641,955 648,916
Veterinary Medical
Services ........................... 1,529,431 1,545,739
Predatory Animal and
Rodent Control ................ 1,086,966 1,105,544
Nutrition Education
Programs ......................... 807,656 808,592
Livestock Enforcement ........ 526,790 534,432
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Commodity Foods
Distribution ..................... $104,970 $104,989
Sec. 24. State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources.
For the support of the:
Conservation and Natural
Resources
Administration ................ $881,139 $815,110
Division of State Parks ......... 15,101,699 15,650,026
Nevada Tahoe Regional
Planning Agency ............. 1,881 1,881
Out-of-State Fire
Suppression Account ...... 100 100
Division of Forestry ............. 13,865,765 14,062,597
Forest Fire Suppression ........ 6,650,010 6,682,897
Forestry Conservation
Camps ............................. 9,778,741 9,984,869
Division of Water
Resources ........................ 12,236,893 12,575,388
Division of State Lands ........ 2,604,573 2,543,075
Division of Natural
Heritage ........................... 307,183 305,952
Division of Outdoor
Recreation ....................... 785,888 796,240
Conservation Districts
Program ........................... 824,836 834,162
Office of Historic
Preservation ..................... 851,099 858,925
Comstock Historic
District............................. 332,532 340,887
Sec. 25. Tahoe Regional Planning Agency.
For the support of the Tahoe
Regional Planning
Agency ................................. $2,783,479 $2,783,479
Sec. 26. Department of Wildlife.
For the support of the:
Law Enforcement ................. $44,984 $42,256
Fisheries Management.......... 151,209 151,209
Game Management .............. 74,341 74,341
Biodiversity Division ........... 577,679 577,320
Conservation Education ....... 231,928 232,216
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Sec. 27. Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation.
For the support of the:
Nevada Equal Rights
Commission .................... $2,482,882 $2,424,466
Bureau of Vocational
Rehabilitation .................. 6,236,993 6,673,956
Bureau of Services to
Persons Who Are
Blind or Visually
Impaired .......................... 812,889 834,159
Commission on
Postsecondary
Education ........................ 697,555 702,144
Nevada P20 Workforce
Reporting......................... 860,951 859,856
Governor’s Office of
Workforce Innovation ..... 230,242 250,906
Sec. 28. Department of Motor Vehicles.
For the support of the
Division of Customer
Services ................................ $35,590 $35,590
Sec. 29. Department of Public Safety.
For the support of the:
Training Division ................. $1,262,678 $1,270,296
Justice Grant ......................... 215,224 208,299
Nevada Highway Patrol
Division ........................... 88,077 87,953
Dignitary Protection ............. 2,609,342 2,635,994
Investigation Division .......... 10,795,125 10,834,836
State Board of Parole
Commissioners ................ 4,385,235 4,399,423
Division of Parole and
Probation ......................... 81,652,316 83,853,032
Central Repository for
Nevada Records of
Criminal History ............. 11,362,358 9,236,114
Child Volunteer
Background Checks ........ 15,086 15,086
State Fire Marshal
Division ........................... 100 100
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Sec. 30. Commission on Ethics.
For the support of the
Commission on Ethics .......... $449,725 $387,182
Sec. 31. Department of Indigent Defense Services.
For the support of the:
Department of Indigent
Defense Services ............. $12,948,021 $12,978,924
Office of the State Public
Defender .......................... 2,443,847 2,376,171
Sec. 32. Department of Sentencing Policy.
For the support of the
Department of Sentencing
Policy.................................... $995,410 $1,009,974
Sec. 33. Peace Officers’ Standards and Training Commission.
For the support of the Peace
Officers’ Standards and
Training Commission ........... $2,905,013 $3,041,756
Sec. 34. Department of Native American Affairs.
For the support of the:
Nevada Indian
Commission .................... $987,461 $1,007,566
Stewart Indian School
Living Legacy ................. 227,619 230,418
Sec. 35. The following sums are hereby appropriated from the
State Highway Fund for the purposes expressed in this section for
Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027:
Department of Motor Vehicles:
Office of the Director ........... $4,142,300 $4,318,318
Fiscal Operations
Division ........................... 12,887,604 12,889,873
Hearings Office .................... 1,726,459 1,742,291
Division of Information
Technology ..................... 11,508,102 10,558,236
Division of Customer
Services ........................... 25,767,571 25,540,339
Division of Compliance
Enforcement .................... 9,846,890 9,946,374
Division of Research and
Project Management ....... 3,703,032 3,711,645
Motor Carrier Division ......... 3,063,361 3,052,829
Department
Transformation Effort ..... 9,512,217 11,189,570
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
2025-2026 2026-2027
Department of Public Safety:
Training Division ................. $1,337,739 $1,345,675
Nevada Highway Patrol
Division ........................... 106,037,375 108,589,658
Highway Safety Plan and
Administration ................ 435,395 437,359
Investigation Division .......... 742,628 766,052
State Emergency
Response Commission .... 331,454 328,563
Highway Safety Grants
Account ........................... 54,081 54,104
Department of Business and Industry:
Nevada Transportation
Authority ......................... $6,177,021 $6,191,225
Legislative Fund:
Legislative Counsel
Bureau ............................. $5,000 $5,000
The Office of the Governor:
CORE.NV ............................ $1,036,232 $1,034,495
Sec. 36. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the
sums appropriated by this act must be:
(a) Expended in accordance with the allotment, transfer, work
program and budget provisions of NRS 353.150 to 353.246,
inclusive; and
(b) Work-programmed for the two separate fiscal years of the
2025-2027 biennium, as required by NRS 353.215. Work programs
may be revised with the approval of the Governor upon the
recommendation of the Director of the Office of Finance in the
Office of the Governor and in accordance with the provisions of
the State Budget Act.
2. Transfers to and from salary allotments, travel allotments,
operating expense allotments, equipment allotments and other
allotments must be allowed and made in accordance with the
provisions of NRS 353.215 to 353.225, inclusive, and after separate
consideration of the merits of each request.
3. Pursuant to law, sums appropriated for the support of the
Supreme Court of Nevada, the Legislative Fund and the Tahoe
Regional Planning Agency are excluded from the allotment,
transfer, work program and budget provisions of NRS 353.150 to
353.246, inclusive.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
4. Transfers of appropriations between fiscal years that are
authorized in this act must be completed on or before September 18,
2026.
5. Amounts of appropriations from the State General Fund may
only be transferred to budget accounts that are included in sections 2
to 34, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 37. The sums appropriated to the following budget
accounts are available for both Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal
Year 2026-2027, and may be transferred from one fiscal year to the
other with the approval of the Interim Finance Committee upon the
recommendation of the Governor:
1. Forest Fire Suppression;
2. National Guard Benefits;
3. Maternal, Child and Adolescent Health Services;
4. Immunization Program;
5. Welfare Administration;
6. Welfare Field Services;
7. Temporary Assistance for Needy Families;
8. Assistance to Aged and Blind;
9. Child Assistance and Development;
10. Nevada Medicaid;
11. Medicaid Administration;
12. Nevada Check-Up Program;
13. Rural Child Welfare;
14. Special Litigation Account;
15. Office of the Extradition Coordinator;
16. Clark County Child Welfare;
17. Washoe County Child Welfare;
18. Child Volunteer Background Checks;
19. Agency for Nuclear Projects;
20. Assessments and Accountability;
21. Problem Gambling;
22. Department Transformation Effort; and
23. Victims of Crime.
Sec. 38. Of the amounts appropriated by sections 2 to 34,
inclusive, of this act, the amounts appropriated in both Fiscal Year
2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to fund deferred maintenance
and extraordinary maintenance projects approved within agency
budgets are available for both Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal
Year 2026-2027 and may be transferred within the same budget
account from one fiscal year to the other with the approval of the
Interim Finance Committee upon the recommendation of the
Governor. Any amount so transferred must be used to complete
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
the deferred maintenance and extraordinary maintenance projects as
approved by the Legislature.
Sec. 39. Of the amounts appropriated to the Office of Finance
in the Office of the Governor by section 2 of this act for the Special
Appropriations budget account, a total of $25,000 in Fiscal Year
2025-2026 is intended to support Civil Air Patrol operations and is
available for both Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, and may be transferred within the same budget account from
Fiscal Year 2025-2026 to Fiscal Year 2026-2027. Any amount so
transferred must be used to pay for Civil Air Patrol operations as
approved by the Legislature.
Sec. 40. Of the amounts appropriated to the Office of Science,
Innovation and Technology in the Office of the Governor by section
2 of this act, $1,000,000 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and $1,000,000
in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to fund the development and improvement
of broadband for schools and libraries, are available for both Fiscal
Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027, and may be transferred
within the same budget account from one fiscal year to the other
with the approval of the Interim Finance Committee upon the
recommendation of the Governor. Any amount so transferred must
be used to pay for the development and improvement of broadband
for schools and libraries as approved by the Legislature.
Sec. 41. Of the amounts appropriated to the Commission on
Ethics by section 30 of this act, $79,679 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026
and $21,450 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the implementation of a
new electronic case management system, are available for both
Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027, and may be
transferred within the same budget account from one fiscal year to
the other with the approval of the Interim Finance Committee upon
the recommendation of the Governor. Any amount so transferred
must be used to pay for the implementation of the Commission’s
electronic case management system as approved by the Legislature.
Sec. 42. Any money remaining in the Workforce Innovations
for a New Nevada Account created by NRS 231.151 at the end of
Fiscal Year 2025-2026 does not revert to the State General Fund and
must be carried forward to Fiscal Year 2026-2027. Any money
remaining in the Account at the end of Fiscal Year 2026-2027 must
not be committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 43. Of the amounts appropriated to the Merit Award
Board by section 8 of this act, $3,000 is intended to administer the
Merit Award Program and $5,000 is intended for program awards,
and both amounts are available for both Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
Fiscal Year 2026-2027, and any unspent balance may be carried
forward from Fiscal Year 2025-2026 to Fiscal Year 2026-2027 with
the approval of the Interim Finance Committee upon the
recommendation of the Governor.
Sec. 44. Of the amounts appropriated to the Supreme Court of
Nevada by section 11 of this act:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 7 to 11,
inclusive, the sums appropriated for the Supreme Court of Nevada,
Administrative Office of the Courts, Court of Appeals, Senior
Justice and Senior Judge Program and Supreme Court Law Library
budget accounts may be transferred between fiscal years and
between those budget accounts with the approval of the Chief
Justice of the Supreme Court and is limited to operating budgets
only. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 4 of NRS
353.220, the approval of the Interim Finance Committee is not
required for any request for the revision of a work program to
transfer money pursuant to this subsection. The Supreme Court of
Nevada shall report quarterly to the Interim Finance Committee
regarding any such transfers between fiscal years and budget
accounts.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to the sums
appropriated for the Specialty Courts, State Judicial Elected
Officials and Judicial Department Staff Salaries budget accounts.
3. The Supreme Court of Nevada shall not request from the
Interim Finance Committee additional money from the Contingency
Account created by NRS 353.266 or a supplemental appropriation
for the Judicial Department Staff Salaries budget account.
4. The Supreme Court of Nevada shall report quarterly to the
Interim Finance Committee information regarding all salary
adjustments and the establishment of new positions.
5. The Supreme Court of Nevada shall include individual
position data in the computerized budgeting system utilized by the
Budget Division of the Office of Finance in the Office of the
Governor in future budget submittals, including, without limitation,
working titles, annual salaries, and all position attributes required to
allow for the budgeting system to calculate salaries and benefits as
well as cost-of-living adjustments and benefit rate changes, as
applicable.
6. The Supreme Court of Nevada shall include
recommendations for increases in the total funding level of base
salaries approved by the Legislature, excluding fringe benefits, with
the total funding level based on the salary of all positions at the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
Employee/Employer Paid Retirement rate in enhancement decision
units in future budget submittals.
7. The amounts of $248,172 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$101,956 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to fund comprehensive training
and education are available for both Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
Fiscal Year 2026-2027, and may be transferred within the
Administrative Office of the Courts budget account from one fiscal
year to the other. Any amount so transferred must be used for
comprehensive training and education as approved by the
Legislature. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 4 of NRS
353.220, the approval of the Interim Finance Committee is not
required for any request for the revision of a work program to
transfer money pursuant to this subsection. The unexpended balance
of the amount transferred pursuant to this subsection must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, and must be reverted
to the State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
8. The amounts of $82,000 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$86,100 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for contract staffing to maintain
legacy information technology systems are available for both Fiscal
Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027, and may be transferred
within the Administrative Office of the Courts budget account from
one fiscal year to the other. Any amount so transferred must be used
for contract staffing to maintain legacy information technology
systems as approved by the Legislature. Notwithstanding the
provisions of subsection 4 of NRS 353.220, the approval of the
Interim Finance Committee is not required for any request for
the revision of a work program to transfer money pursuant to this
subsection. The unexpended balance of the amount transferred
pursuant to this subsection must not be committed for expenditure
after June 30, 2027, and must be reverted to the State General Fund
on or before September 17, 2027.
9. The amounts of $175,930 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$175,930 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the support and continued
development of an electronic portal for the Guardianship Program
are available for both Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, and may be transferred within the Administrative Office of
the Courts budget account from one fiscal year to the other. Any
amount so transferred must be used for the support and continued
development of an electronic portal for the Guardianship Program as
approved by the Legislature. Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsection 4 of NRS 353.220, the approval of the Interim Finance
Committee is not required for any request for the revision of a work
program to transfer money pursuant to this subsection. The
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
unexpended balance of the amount transferred pursuant to this
subsection must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, and must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 17, 2027.
10. The amounts of $596,561 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$496,561 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to operate the Supreme Court’s
Technology Unit independent of the Governor’s Technology Office
are available for both Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, and may be transferred within the Administrative Office of
the Courts budget account from one fiscal year to the other. Any
amount so transferred must be used to operate the Supreme Court’s
Technology Unit independent of the Governor’s Technology Office
as approved by the Legislature. Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsection 4 of NRS 353.220, the approval of the Interim Finance
Committee is not required for any request for the revision of a work
program to transfer money pursuant to this subsection. The
unexpended balance of the amount transferred pursuant to this
subsection must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, and must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 17, 2027.
11. The amounts of $22,447 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$16,950 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to expand the Court Interpreter
Program are available for both Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal
Year 2026-2027, and may be transferred within the Administrative
Office of the Courts budget account from one fiscal year to the
other. Any amount so transferred must be used to expand the Court
Interpreter Program as approved by the Legislature.
Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 4 of NRS 353.220, the
approval of the Interim Finance Committee is not required for any
request for the revision of a work program to transfer money
pursuant to this subsection. The unexpended balance of the amount
transferred pursuant to this subsection must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, and must be reverted to the State
General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 45. Of the amounts appropriated to the Department of
Motor Vehicles by section 35 of this act for the Fiscal Operations
Division budget account, $2,000,000 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$2,000,000 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027 to fund credit card fees are
available for both Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-
2027, and may be transferred within the same budget account from
one fiscal year to the other with the approval of the Interim Finance
Committee upon the recommendation of the Governor. The
appropriated amounts approved to fund credit card fees pursuant to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
this section may only be used for those expenses, and any amount so
transferred must be used to pay credit card fees as approved by the
Legislature.
Sec. 46. Any money remaining in the Account for the Office
of Science, Innovation and Technology created by NRS 223.630 for
the Graduate Medical Education Grant Program at the end of Fiscal
Year 2024-2025 does not revert to the State General Fund, and must
be transferred to the Account for the Graduate Medical Education
Grant Program created by NRS 223.631 on or before September 19,
2025. Any balance in the Account for the Graduate Medical
Education Grant Program and any portion of appropriations made to
the Account remaining at the end of Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
Fiscal Year 2026-2027, respectively, must be carried forward.
Sec. 47. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) and
(b) of subsection 1 of NRS 353.288, the State Controller shall not
make a transfer required by paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 1 of
NRS 353.288 during Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-
2027 from the State General Fund to the Account to Stabilize the
Operation of the Government created by NRS 353.288.
Sec. 48. Any remaining balance of the sums appropriated to
the Prison Industry and Prison Ranch budget accounts by section 21
of this act do not revert to the State General Fund.
Sec. 49. Any remaining balance of the $1,000,000
appropriation from the State General Fund approved by the 2015
Legislature for sagebrush habitat improvement projects does not
revert to the State General Fund.
Sec. 50. Of the amounts appropriated to the State Department
of Conservation and Natural Resources by section 24 of this act for
the Conservation and Natural Resources Administration budget
account, $50,000 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and $50,000 in Fiscal
Year 2026-2027 to fund contract services to update the
Conservation Credit System Manual and Nevada’s Scientific
Methods Document and Habitat Quantification Tool, are available
for both Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027, and
may be transferred within the same budget account from one fiscal
year to the other with the approval of the Interim Finance
Committee upon the recommendation of the Governor. Any amount
so transferred must be used to pay for contract services to update the
Conservation Credit System Manual and Nevada’s Scientific
Methods Document and Habitat Quantification Tool as approved by
the Legislature.
Sec. 51. Any money remaining in the Knowledge Account
created by NRS 231.1592 and the Account for the Nevada Main
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
Street Program created by NRS 231.1536 at the end of Fiscal Year
2024-2025 and any remaining portion of any appropriations made to
those Accounts for the 2023-2025 biennium do not revert to the
State General Fund. The balance in those Accounts and any portion
of appropriations remaining at the end of Fiscal Year 2024-2025
must be carried forward to Fiscal Year 2025-2026. Any balance in
those Accounts and any portion of appropriations made to those
Accounts remaining at the end of Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal
Year 2026-2027, respectively, must be carried forward.
Sec. 52. 1. Of the sums appropriated by section 16 of this
act, any amounts used to match documented research grants
received by the Nevada System of Higher Education which are not
committed for expenditure by June 30 of each fiscal year of the
2025-2027 biennium may be carried forward for a maximum of 2
fiscal years, after which time any unexpended amounts must be
reverted to the State General Fund.
2. All money appropriated by section 16 of this act, other than
the amounts described in subsection 1 to match documented
research grants, is subject to the provisions of section 81 of this act.
Sec. 53. The sums appropriated by this act to any division,
bureau, agency or section of any department of the State
Government for the support of salaries and payroll costs may be
transferred to any other division, bureau, agency or section of the
same department for the support of salaries and payroll costs with
the approval of the Interim Finance Committee upon the
recommendation of the Governor. Such transfers are limited only to
those activities which are supported by appropriations from the State
General Fund or the State Highway Fund.
Sec. 54. 1. The sums appropriated to the Legislative Fund by
section 10 of this act for the support of the Legislative Commission,
the divisions of the Legislative Counsel Bureau and Interim
Legislative Operations are available for both Fiscal Year 2025-2026
and Fiscal Year 2026-2027, and may be transferred among the
various budget accounts of the Legislative Commission, the
divisions of the Legislative Counsel Bureau and Interim Legislative
Operations and from one fiscal year to the other with the approval of
the Legislative Commission upon the recommendation of the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau.
2. The sums appropriated for the support of salaries and payroll
costs must be applied pursuant to the budget approved by the
Legislature.
Sec. 55. The sums appropriated to the Division of Social
Services of the Department of Human Services by section 17 of this
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
act may be transferred among the various budget accounts of the
Division of Social Services with the approval of the Interim Finance
Committee upon the recommendation of the Governor.
Sec. 56. The sums appropriated to the Nevada Health
Authority by section 18 of this act for the Nevada Medicaid and the
Nevada Check-Up Program budget accounts may be transferred
between those budget accounts with the approval of the Interim
Finance Committee upon the recommendation of the Governor.
Sec. 57. The sums appropriated to the Division of Child and
Family Services of the Department of Human Services by section 17
of this act for the Summit View Youth Center, Caliente Youth
Center and the Nevada Youth Training Center budget accounts may
be transferred among those budget accounts with the approval of the
Interim Finance Committee upon the recommendation of the
Governor.
Sec. 58. The sums appropriated to the Division of Child and
Family Services of the Department of Human Services by section 17
of this act for the Northern Nevada Child and Adolescent Services
and Southern Nevada Child and Adolescent Services budget
accounts may be transferred between those budget accounts with the
approval of the Interim Finance Committee upon the
recommendation of the Governor.
Sec. 59. The sums appropriated to the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health of the Department of Human Services by section
17 of this act for the Southern Nevada Adult Mental Health
Services, Northern Nevada Adult Mental Health Services and
Lake’s Crossing Center budget accounts may be transferred among
those budget accounts with the approval of the Interim Finance
Committee upon the recommendation of the Governor.
Sec. 60. 1. The Department of Human Services may, with
the approval of the Interim Finance Committee upon the
recommendation of the Governor, transfer from the various
divisions of the Department to an account which is hereby created
within the State General Fund any excess money available to the
divisions as a result of savings from not providing health and related
services, including, without limitation, savings recognized by using
a different source of funding to pay the providers of services if the
persons previously served by a division no longer require the
provision of services from the division.
2. Any money transferred to the account created by subsection
1, to the extent approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services and authorized by the State Plan for Medicaid, must:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
(a) Be transferred by the Department to the Nevada Health
Authority to be used to pay administrative and related costs and the
State’s share of the cost for participation in the private hospital
collaborative upper payment limit program. Any remaining money
to pay the State’s share of the cost for participation in the private
hospital collaborative upper payment limit program must be
transferred not later than September 30 of the following fiscal year
for the benefit of the upper payment limit program.
(b) After being used to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (a),
be:
(1) Reserved for reversion to the State General Fund and
reverted to the State General Fund at the end of each fiscal year of
the 2025-2027 biennium; or
(2) Transferred to the Fund for a Healthy Nevada created by
NRS 439.620 at the end of each fiscal year of the 2025-2027
biennium.
Sec. 61. The sums appropriated to the Aging and Disability
Services Division of the Department of Human Services by section
17 of this act for the Desert Regional Center, Sierra Regional Center
and Rural Regional Center budget accounts may be transferred
among those budget accounts for residential support, family support
and respite and jobs and day training services with the approval of
the Interim Finance Committee upon the recommendation of the
Governor.
Sec. 62. The sums appropriated to the Nevada Health
Authority by section 18 of this act for the Nevada Medicaid and
Nevada Check-Up Program budget accounts may be transferred to
the Medicaid Administration budget account with the approval of
the Interim Finance Committee upon recommendation of the
Governor. Money may only be transferred to the Medicaid
Administration budget account pursuant to this section for personnel
and administrative costs necessary for implementing the provisions
of NRS 422.401 to 422.406, inclusive, in Fiscal Year 2025-2026
and Fiscal Year 2026-2027 upon submittal of an analysis
demonstrating savings in the Nevada Medicaid and Nevada Check-
Up Program budget accounts resulting from the provisions of NRS
422.401 to 422.406, inclusive.
Sec. 63. The sums appropriated to the Nevada System of
Higher Education by section 16 of this act may be transferred
among the various budget accounts of the Nevada System of Higher
Education included in the Executive Budget with the approval of the
Interim Finance Committee upon the recommendation of the
Governor.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
Sec. 64. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2
and 3, the sums appropriated to the Department of Corrections by
section 21 of this act may be transferred among the various budget
accounts of the Department of Corrections in the same manner and
within the same limits as allowed for revisions of work programs in
NRS 353.220.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to
appropriations to the Department for deferred maintenance and
extraordinary maintenance projects transferred pursuant to section
38 of this act.
3. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to the sums
appropriated for the Training Academy budget account.
Sec. 65. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 of NRS 695K.300, the amounts appropriated by section
18 of this act are made directly to the Public Option budget account
under the Nevada Health Authority for the operation of the Public
Option.
Sec. 66. It is the intent of the Legislature that the amounts
appropriated by section 18 of this act to the Nevada Health
Authority for the Nevada Medicaid and the Nevada Check-Up
Program budget accounts must be expended in such a manner as to
continue the current service delivery model for prescription drugs in
which persons enrolled in Medicaid and Check-Up managed care
programs receive prescription drugs through a Medicaid managed
care organization in the 2025-2027 biennium.
Sec. 67. The total sums appropriated by section 17 of this act
for the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families and Child
Assistance and Development budget accounts of the Division of
Social Services of the Department of Human Services and by
section 18 of this act to the Nevada Medicaid and Nevada Check-Up
Program budget accounts of the Nevada Health Authority are limits.
The Nevada Health Authority or the Division of Social Services
shall not request additional money for these budget accounts, except
for:
1. Increased State costs in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal
Year 2026-2027 in the event that federal financial participation rates
are less than the amounts approved by the Legislature effective on
October 1, 2025;
2. Costs related to additional services or populations which are
mandated by the Federal Government on or after October 1, 2025,
and which are not specifically funded in the Nevada Medicaid
budget account in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year
2026-2027;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
3. Costs related to the Medicaid county match and waiver
populations that exceed the 8-cent county reimbursement cap
established pursuant to NRS 428.285;
4. Increased State costs in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal
Year 2026-2027, in the event that the annual allocation of federal
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant funds is
lower than the amounts approved by the Legislature for either fiscal
year;
5. Increased State costs in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal
Year 2026-2027 due to federal changes in the payment structure of
Nevada Medicaid or the Nevada Check-Up Program; or
6. Increased State costs in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal
Year 2026-2027 due to higher than budgeted prescription drug costs
for fee-for-service participants.
Sec. 68. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the sums
appropriated to the Division of Child and Family Services of the
Department of Human Services by section 17 of this act for the
Clark County Child Welfare and Washoe County Child Welfare
budget accounts for the purpose of providing respite and block grant
allocations to agencies which provide child welfare services in a
county whose population is 100,000 or more, are limits. The
Division shall not request additional sums for these budget accounts,
except that the Division may request additional sums for the
adoption assistance programs described in NRS 432B.219.
Sec. 69. Of the amounts appropriated to the Aging and
Disability Services Division of the Department of Human Services
by section 17 of this act for the Home- and Community-Based
Services budget account to fund the rates paid to providers of
personal care services for the Community Options Program for the
Elderly and the Personal Care Services Program, not less than $16
of the $25 per hour reimbursement rate received by providers must
be paid as an hourly wage to direct care workers. The hourly wage
of $16 must be paid as direct compensation and may not be
decreased by health insurance or any other employee benefit costs.
Sec. 70. Of the amounts appropriated to the Nevada Health
Authority by section 18 of this act for the Nevada Medicaid budget
account to fund the rates paid to providers of personal care services,
not less than $16 of the $25 per hour reimbursement rate received
by providers must be paid as an hourly wage to direct care workers.
The hourly wage of $16 must be paid as direct compensation and
may not be decreased by health insurance or any other employee
benefit costs.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
Sec. 71. In addition to the requirements of NRS 353.225, for
Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027, the Board of
Regents of the University of Nevada shall comply with any request
by the Governor to set aside money from the appropriations made
by this act in any specified amount.
Sec. 72. 1. If the Director of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources determines in Fiscal Year
2025-2026 or Fiscal Year 2026-2027 that, because of delays in the
receipt of revenue for services billed to the Federal Government,
local governments and other state governments, the amount of
current claims for expenses incurred in the suppression of fires or
response to emergencies exceeds the amount of money available to
pay such claims within 30 days, he or she may request from the
Director of the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor a
temporary advance from the State General Fund to pay authorized
expenses.
2. The Director of the Office of Finance in the Office of the
Governor shall provide written notification to the State Controller
and to the Senate and Assembly Fiscal Analysts of the Fiscal
Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau if he or she
approves a request made pursuant to subsection 1. The State
Controller shall draw his or her warrant upon receipt of such a
notification.
3. An advance from the State General Fund:
(a) May be approved by the Director of the Office of Finance in
the Office of the Governor only for expenses incurred in the
suppression of fires or response to emergencies charged to the
Forest Fire Suppression or Out-of-State Fire Suppression Account
budget accounts of the Division of Forestry of the State Department
of Conservation and Natural Resources. Before approving the
advance, the Director shall verify that billings for reimbursement
have been sent to the agencies of the Federal Government, local
governments or other state governments responsible for reimbursing
the Division of Forestry for costs incurred in activities relating to the
suppression of fires or response to emergencies.
(b) Is limited to the total due from outstanding billings for
reimbursable expenses incurred in the suppression of fires or
response to emergencies as approved for payment to the State by
agencies of the Federal Government, local governments and other
state governments.
4. Any money which is temporarily advanced from the State
General Fund to the Forest Fire Suppression budget account or
Out-of-State Fire Suppression Account budget account pursuant to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
this section must be repaid on or before the last business day in
August immediately following the end of the fiscal year in which
the temporary advance was approved.
Sec. 73. 1. If the Governor orders the Nevada National
Guard into active service as described in NRS 412.122 for an
emergency, as defined in subsection 1 of NRS 353.263, in Fiscal
Year 2025-2026 or Fiscal Year 2026-2027 and the Adjutant General
of the Office of the Military determines expenditures will be
required, the Adjutant General may request from the Director of the
Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor a temporary
advance from the State General Fund for the payment of authorized
expenses.
2. The Director of the Office of Finance in the Office of the
Governor shall provide written notification to the State Controller
and to the Senate and Assembly Fiscal Analysts of the Fiscal
Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau of the approval
of a request made pursuant to subsection 1. The State Controller
shall draw his or her warrant upon receipt of the approval by the
Director of the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor.
3. An advance from the State General Fund:
(a) Must be approved by the Director of the Office of Finance in
the Office of the Governor for expenses incurred as a result of
activation of the Nevada National Guard.
(b) Is limited to $50,000 per activation as described in
subsection 1.
4. Any money which is temporarily advanced from the State
General Fund to a budget account pursuant to subsection 2 must be
repaid as soon as possible, and the repayment must be made from
the Emergency Account created by NRS 353.263.
Sec. 74. The amounts appropriated by section 6 of this act to
the Office of the State Treasurer for costs related to the
administration of the Nevada Employee Savings Trust Program
established pursuant to chapter 353D of NRS are a loan and must be
repaid as soon as the Office has received sufficient money for the
operation of the Program.
Sec. 75. The amounts appropriated by section 2 of this act to
the Nevada Office of Cyber Defense Coordination are a loan.
Commencing on July 1, 2027, the Office of the Governor shall use
revenues from intergovernmental transfers to repay the loan in
annual installments to the State Treasurer for deposit in the State
General Fund. Each annual installment must be 25 percent of the
loan and the loan must be fully repaid not later than the end of
Fiscal Year 2030-2031.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 29 –
Sec. 76. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Public Employees’ Retirement Board the sum of
$103,477 for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and $105,182 for Fiscal Year
2026-2027 for the administration of the Legislators’ Retirement
System.
Sec. 77. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Legislative Fund created by NRS 218A.150 the sum of
$16,365,429 for the costs of the 83rd Legislative Session.
Sec. 78. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Legislative Fund created by NRS 218A.150 the sum of
$8,118,404 for the costs of information technology projects and
equipment and for dues and registration costs for national
organizations.
Sec. 79. 1. During the 2025-2027 biennium, the Legislative
Auditor shall conduct an audit of the Aging and Disability Services
Division’s Early Intervention Services Program, including, without
limitation, an analysis of the Program’s state and community
providers’ records related to services provided and billing practices,
including, without limitation, reimbursements from Medicaid and
private insurance, an evaluation of the claims submitted for
reimbursement and an assessment of the adequacy of the Program’s
internal controls.
2. The Legislative Auditor shall present a final written report
of the audit conducted pursuant to subsection 1 to the Audit
Subcommittee of the Legislative Commission not later than
January 31, 2027.
Sec. 80. Section 44 of chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023,
at page 1248, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 44. 1. Of the amounts appropriated to the State
Department of Conservation and Natural Resources by
section 23 of this act for the Division of State Lands budget
account, $840,284 in Fiscal Year 2023-2024 and $63,000 in
Fiscal Year 2024-2025 to replace the Division’s land
management system, are available for both Fiscal Year 2023-
2024 and Fiscal Year 2024-2025, and may be transferred
within the same budget account from one fiscal year to the
other with the approval of the Interim Finance Committee
upon the recommendation of the Governor. Any amount so
transferred must be used to pay for replacement of the
Division’s land management system as approved by the
Legislature.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made
by subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 30 –
June 30, 2026, by the entity to which the appropriation is
made or any entity to which money from the appropriation
is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and any
portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 18, 2026, by either
the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or
transferred, and must be reverted to the State General Fund
on or before September 18, 2026.
Sec. 81. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
sections 46, 48, 51, 52 and 76 of this act, any balances of the
appropriations made by this act for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
Fiscal Year 2026-2027 must not be committed for expenditure after
June 30 of each fiscal year, respectively, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027,
respectively, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred and, except as otherwise provided in
subsection 2, must be reverted to the fund from which it was
appropriated on or before September 18, 2026, and September 17,
2027, respectively.
2. Any balance of the appropriations made to the Legislative
Fund by sections 10, 77 and 78 of this act does not revert to the
State General Fund but constitutes a balance carried forward.
Sec. 82. The State Controller shall provide for the payment of
claims legally obligated in each fiscal year of the 2025-2027
biennium on behalf of state agencies until the last business day of
the August immediately following the end of each fiscal year. The
State Controller shall process any transactions requested by the
Director of the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor from
the previous fiscal year until the third Friday in September
immediately following the end of the fiscal year.
Sec. 83. The State Controller shall transfer among the
appropriate budget accounts and funds the amounts necessary to
carry out the budget approved by the Legislature, and the amounts
so transferred shall be deemed appropriated.
Sec. 84. The State Controller shall pay the annual salaries of
the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Secretary of State, the
State Treasurer, the State Controller and the Attorney General in
biweekly installments for each day worked up to and including the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 31 –
date of payment. The payment of a portion of the annual salaries of
these officers at the end of a calendar year for the purpose of
reconciling the amount of the salary paid during that calendar year
with the amount of the salary set forth in statute for that office must
not be made if it will result in the issuance of a separate check.
Sec. 85. 1. If projections of the ending balance of the State
General Fund fall below the amount estimated by the 83rd Session
of the Nevada Legislature for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 or Fiscal Year
2026-2027, the Chief of the Budget Division of the Office of
Finance in the Office of the Governor shall report this information
to the State Board of Examiners.
2. If the State Board of Examiners determines that the ending
balance of the State General Fund is projected to be less than
$175,000,000 for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 or Fiscal Year 2026-2027,
the Governor, pursuant to NRS 353.225, may direct the Chief of the
Budget Division of the Office of Finance in the Office of the
Governor to require the State Controller or the head of each
department, institution or agency to set aside a reserve of not more
than 15 percent of the total amount of operating expenses or other
appropriations and money otherwise available to the department,
institution or agency.
3. A reserve must not be set aside pursuant to this section
unless:
(a) The Governor, on behalf of the State Board of Examiners,
submits a report to the Legislature or, if the Legislature is not in
session, to the Interim Finance Committee, stating the reasons why a
reserve is needed and indicating each department, institution or
agency that will be required to set aside a reserve; and
(b) The Legislature or Interim Finance Committee approves the
setting aside of the reserve.
Sec. 86. If the State of Nevada is required to make payment to
the United States Treasury under the provisions of Public Law 101-
453, the Cash Management Improvement Act of 1990, the State
Controller, upon approval of the State Board of Examiners, may
make such payments from the interest earnings of the State General
Fund or interest earnings in other funds when interest on federal
money has been deposited in those funds.
Sec. 87. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of
subsection 2 of NRS 422.27497, the Director of the Nevada Health
Authority shall establish rates of reimbursement which are provided
on a fee-for-service basis for applied behavior analysis services, as
defined in NRS 422.27497, for the Nevada Medicaid and Nevada
Check-Up Program budget accounts as approved by the Legislature.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 32 –
Sec. 88. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 81 of
this act, the remaining balance of any money appropriated by this
act to a nonreversionary account does not revert to the State General
Fund at the end of a fiscal year and must be carried forward to the
next fiscal year.
2. As used in this section, “nonreversionary account” means an
account created in the Nevada Revised Statutes in which the money
does not revert to the State General Fund at the end of a fiscal year
and must be carried forward.
Sec. 89. If the name of an officer or agency has been changed
or the responsibilities of an officer or agency have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of another act enacted by the 83rd Session
of the Legislature and approved by the Governor and the change in
name or transfer of duties is not indicated in this act, any reference
to that officer or agency in this act shall be deemed to refer to the
officer or agency the name of which or duties of which have been
changed or transferred by the other act.
Sec. 90. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 218D.430 and
218D.435, a committee may vote on this act before the expiration of
the period prescribed for the return of a fiscal note in NRS
218D.475. This section applies retroactively from and after May 18,
2025.
Sec. 91. 1. This section and sections 46, 47, 49, 51, 77 to 80,
inclusive, 89 and 90 of this act become effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 45, inclusive, 48, 50, 52 to 76, inclusive, and
81 to 88, inclusive, of this act become effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)